Utah statutes.
62A-11-303.7.   Annual fee for child support services to a custodial parent who has not received TANF assistance.

(1)  The office shall impose an annual fee of $25 in each case in which services are provided by the office if:

(a)  the custodial parent who received the services has never received assistance under a state program funded under Title IV, Part A of the Social Security Act; and

(b)  the office has collected at least $500 of child support in the case.

(2)  The fee described in Subsection (1) shall be:

(a)  subject to Subsection (3), retained by the office from child support collected on behalf of the custodial parent described in Subsection (1)(a); or

(b)  paid by the custodial parent described in Subsection (1)(a).

(3)  A fee retained under Subsection (2)(a) may not be retained from the first $500 of child support collected in the case.

(4)  The fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the General Fund as a dedicated credit to be used by the office for the purpose of collecting child support.

